North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-15 Pharmacists
43-15-31.4.
Limited prescriptive practices.

A pharmacist has limited prescriptive practices to initiate or modify drug therapy following diagnosis or established protocols by a licensed physician or an advanced practice registered nurse, under the supervision of the licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse, in accordance with this section. The licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, and the pharmacist must have access to the patient’s appropriate medical records. The care provided to the patient by the pharmacist must be recorded in the patient’s medical records and communicated to the licensed physician or the advanced practice registered nurse.

The licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse, and the pharmacist, shall prepare a collaborative agreement concerning the scope of the pharmacist’s prescriptive practices and shall update the agreement if the scope of the pharmacist’s prescriptive practices is modified. The collaborative agreement, or an amendment to the agreement, is effective if executed by the licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse, and the pharmacist.

The collaborative agreement may be between a medical director and pharmacist-in-charge. The medical director and pharmacist-in-charge shall document and update the agreement for any physician, advanced practice registered nurse, and pharmacist covered under the agreement.

A collaborative agreement must be made available to the respective licensing boards of the parties to the agreement.

The collaborative agreement must include a provision that requires the pharmacist to immediately notify the licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse if the pharmacist initiates or modifies a drug therapy.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 408, § 1; 2001, ch. 376, § 1; 2015, ch. 295, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 297, § 16, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 352, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

43-15-31.5.
Administration of drugs — Rules. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A pharmacist who administers drugs must have authority from the board. The board shall adopt rules to establish educational and operational requirements for a pharmacist to obtain and maintain authority to administer drugs. The board may adopt rules to establish educational and operational requirements to allow a pharmacy technician to administer a drug under the immediate personal supervision and control of a pharmacist. Rules adopted by the board under this section must include:

Educational requirements, which include, at a minimum:

Basic immunology, including the human immune response;

The mechanism of immunity, adverse effects, dose, and administration schedule of available vaccines and approved medication and immunization;

Current immunization guidelines and recommendations of the centers for disease control and prevention;

Management of adverse events, including identification, appropriate response, documentation, and reporting;

Physiology and techniques of administration of drugs; and

Recordkeeping requirements established by law, rule, and regulation or established standards of care.

A requirement an authorized pharmacist shall obtain and maintain current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation or basic cardiac life support.

Requirements for content of practitioner orders and protocols.

Requirements relating to the reporting of the administration to a patient’s primary health care provider and to the state department of health.

Requirements relating to environments in which drugs may be administered.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 375, § 2; 2019, ch. 350, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 313, § 1, effective March 26, 2021.

Note.

" Section 43-15-31.5 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 361 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 1 of Chapter 313, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2279."

43-15-31.5.
Administration of drugs — Rules. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A pharmacist who administers drugs must have authority from the board. The board shall adopt rules to establish educational and operational requirements for a pharmacist to obtain and maintain authority to administer drugs. The board may adopt rules to establish educational and operational requirements to allow a pharmacy technician to administer a drug under the immediate personal supervision and control of a pharmacist. Rules adopted by the board under this section must include:

Educational requirements , which include, at a minimum:

Basic immunology, including the human immune response;

The mechanism of immunity, adverse effects, dose, and administration schedule of available vaccines and approved medication and immunization;

Current immunization guidelines and recommendations of the centers for disease control and prevention;

Management of adverse events, including identification, appropriate response, documentation, and reporting;

Recordkeeping requirements established by law, rule, and regulation or established standards of care.

A requirement an authorized pharmacist shall obtain and maintain current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation or basic cardiac life support.

Requirements for content of practitioner orders and protocols.

Requirements relating to the reporting of the administration to a patient’s primary health care provider and to the department of health and human services.

Requirements relating to environments in which drugs may be administered.

Physiology and techniques of administration of drugs; and

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 375, § 2; 2019, ch. 350, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 352, § 361, effective September 1, 2022.

43-15-32.
Who may engage in drug business.

Every store, dispensary, pharmacy, laboratory, or office, selling, dispensing, or compounding drugs, medicines, or chemicals, or compounding or dispensing prescriptions of medical practitioners in the state, and every business carried on under a name which contains the words “drugs”, “drugstore”, or “pharmacy”, or which is described or referred to in such terms by advertisements, circulars, posters, signs, or otherwise, must be in charge of a registered pharmacist.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, §§ 2, 26; C.L. 1913, §§ 476, 500; S.L. 1927, ch. 211, § 1; 1931, ch. 212, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 43-1532; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 481; 1979, ch. 467, § 12.

Law Reviews.

Note: North Dakota’s Pharmacy Ownership Law: An Analysis of the Strictest Pharmacy Ownership Law in the United States, see 86 N.D. L. Rev. 355 (2010).

43-15-33.
License to sell emergency medicines. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 379, § 8.

43-15-34.
Operation of pharmacy — Permit required — Application — Fee.

No person, copartnership, association, corporation, or limited liability company shall open, establish, operate, or maintain any pharmacy within this state without first obtaining a permit so to do from the board. Application for the permit shall be made upon a form to be prescribed and furnished by the board and shall be accompanied by a fee to be set by the board not to exceed three hundred dollars. A like fee shall be paid upon each annual renewal thereof. Separate applications shall be made and separate permits required for each pharmacy opened, established, operated, or maintained by the same owner and for the change of location, name, or ownership of an existing pharmacy.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 193, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 43-1534; S.L. 1949, ch. 290, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 43-1534; S.L. 1973, ch. 353, § 1; 1979, ch. 467, § 13; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

43-15-34.1.
Out-of-state pharmacies.

Any pharmacy operating outside the state which ships, mails, or delivers in any manner a dispensed prescription drug or legend drug into North Dakota shall obtain and hold a pharmacy permit issued by the North Dakota state board of pharmacy and that part of the pharmacy operation dispensing the prescription for a North Dakota resident shall abide by state law and rules of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 521, § 1.

43-15-35.
Requirements for permit to operate pharmacy — Exceptions.

The board shall issue a permit to operate a pharmacy, or a renewal permit, upon satisfactory proof of all of the following:

The pharmacy will be conducted in full compliance with existing laws and with the rules and regulations established by the board.

The equipment and facilities of the pharmacy are such that prescriptions can be filled accurately and properly, and United States pharmacopeia and national formulary preparations properly compounded and so that it may be operated and maintained in a manner that will not endanger public health and safety.

The pharmacy is equipped with proper pharmaceutical and sanitary appliances and kept in a clean, sanitary, and orderly manner.

The management of the pharmacy is under the personal charge of a pharmacist duly licensed under the laws of this state.

The applicant for such permit is qualified to conduct the pharmacy, and is a licensed pharmacist in good standing or is a partnership, each active member of which is a licensed pharmacist in good standing; a corporation or an association, the majority stock in which is owned by licensed pharmacists in good standing; or a limited liability company, the majority membership interests in which is owned by licensed pharmacists in good standing, actively and regularly employed in and responsible for the management, supervision, and operation of such pharmacy.

Suitable reference sources either in book or electronic data form, are available in the pharmacy or online, which might include the United States pharmacopeia and national formulary, the United States pharmacopeia dispensing information, facts and comparisons, micro medex, the American society of health-system pharmacists formulary, or other suitable references pertinent to the practice carried on in the licensed pharmacy.

The provisions of subdivision e of subsection 1 do not apply to:

The holder of a permit on July 1, 1963, if otherwise qualified to conduct the pharmacy, provided that any such permitholder that discontinues operations under such permit or fails to renew such permit upon expiration is not exempt from the provisions of subdivision e of subsection 1 as to the discontinued or lapsed permit.

A hospital pharmacy furnishing service only to patients in that hospital.

The applicant for a permit to operate a pharmacy which is a hospital, if the pharmacy for which the hospital seeks a permit to operate is a retail pharmacy that is the sole provider of pharmacy services in the community and is a retail pharmacy that was in existence before the hospital took over operations. A hospital operating a pharmacy under this subdivision may operate the pharmacy at any location in the community.

The applicant for a permit to operate a pharmacy which is the owner of a postgraduate medical residency training program if the pharmacy is collocated with and is run in direct conjunction with the postgraduate medical residency training program. For purposes of this subdivision, the postgraduate medical residency training program must be accredited by the accreditation council on graduate medical education or other national accrediting organization.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 193, §§ 2, 6; R.C. 1943, § 43-1535; S.L. 1963, ch. 311, § 1; 1987, ch. 520, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 88; 1993, ch. 422, § 31; 1999, ch. 379, § 7; 2007, ch. 364, § 1; 2007, ch. 365, § 1.

43-15-36.
Board shall make rules and regulations governing permits — Prescribe equipment necessary.

The rules and regulations relating to the granting, revocation, and renewal of a permit must be adopted and become effective only upon the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board. The board shall prescribe the minimum of technical equipment which a pharmacy at all times must possess.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 193, §§ 4, 6; R.C. 1943, § 43-1536.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

43-15-37.
Term of permit — Renewal — Fee — Application. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

43-15-38.
Failure to renew permit — When new permit granted.

If an application for renewal of a permit issued for the operation or maintenance of a pharmacy in this state is not made before the first day of June of the fiscal year for which the permit was issued, the existing permit, or renewal permit, lapses and becomes null and void upon the thirtieth day of that month. A new or further renewal of a permit may be granted only:

Upon evidence satisfactory to the board of good and sufficient reason or excuse for failure to file an application within the time prescribed.

Upon payment of the regular renewal fee and an additional fee to be set by the board not to exceed two hundred dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 193, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 43-1538; S.L. 1949, ch. 291, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 43-1538; S.L. 1973, ch. 354, § 1; 1979, ch. 467, § 14.

43-15-38.1.
Closing a pharmacy.

The permitholder and the pharmacist in charge are jointly responsible to follow the procedures outlined in the rules for closing a pharmacy.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 363, § 5.

43-15-39.
Permit and renewal permit posted — Not transferable.

The permit to operate and maintain a pharmacy in this state, and the renewal thereof, must be posted and exposed in a conspicuous place in the pharmacy. Such permit or renewal permit is not transferable.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 193, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 43-1539.

43-15-40.
Board may revoke permits and renewal permits.

The board, after due notice and opportunity to be heard, may revoke any permit to establish and maintain a pharmacy, or a renewal thereof, if it is disclosed upon an examination or inspection that the pharmacy is not being operated or conducted according to the rules and regulations of the board and the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 193, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 43-1540.

Collateral References.

Revocation or suspension of license or permit to practice pharmacy or operate drugstore because of improper sale or distribution of narcotic or stimulant drugs, 17 A.L.R.3d 1408.

43-15-41.
Board to give notice of refusal or revocation of permits — Appeal.

If an application for a permit or for a renewal thereof is refused, or a permit or a renewal of permit is revoked, the board shall notify the applicant or permittee by registered or certified mail of such refusal or revocation, with its reasons therefor. The applicant or permittee aggrieved by the refusal or revocation may appeal from the decision or order of the board to the district court of Burleigh County, at any time within thirty days after the receipt of the decision or order appealed from. The appellant shall give bond in the penal sum of two hundred fifty dollars, to be approved by the clerk of the district court, conditioned that appellant will pay all costs if the order or decision of the board is affirmed. With the perfecting of the appeal and the filing of the bond, the decision or order of the board must be stayed pending the determination of the appeal.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 193, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 43-1541.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

43-15-42.
Penalty for violation of rule regulating pharmacies.

Any person who violates any rule legally adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 193, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 43-1542; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 482; 1987, ch. 520, § 3.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Law Reviews.

Note: North Dakota’s Pharmacy Ownership Law: An Analysis of the Strictest Pharmacy Ownership Law in the United States, see 86 N.D. L. Rev. 355 (2010).

43-15-42.1.
Penalties — Reinstatement — Criminal prosecutions — Judicial review.

Upon the finding of the existence of grounds for discipline of any person holding, seeking, or renewing a permit or license under this chapter, the board may impose one or more of the following penalties:

Suspension of the offender’s permit or license for a term to be determined by the board.

Revocation of the offender’s permit or license.

Restriction of the offender’s permit or license to prohibit the offender from performing certain acts or from engaging in the practice of pharmacy in a particular manner for a term to be determined by the board.

Refusal to issue or renew offender’s permit or license.

Placement of the offender or the offender’s permit or license under suspension and supervision by the board for a period to be determined by the board.

Cancellation of the offender’s permit or license.

Reprimand.

Imposition of a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars for each offense involving diversion of controlled substances or a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars for any other offense, with the sanction that the permit or license may be suspended until the fine is paid to the board.

Any person whose permit or license to practice pharmacy in North Dakota has been suspended, revoked, or restricted pursuant to this chapter, whether voluntarily or by action of the board, has the right, at reasonable intervals, to petition the board for reinstatement of such permit or license. A petition must be made in writing and in the form prescribed by the board. Upon investigation and hearing, the board may in its discretion grant or deny such petition, or it may modify its original finding to reflect any circumstances which have changed sufficiently to warrant such modifications.

Nothing herein shall be construed as barring criminal prosecutions for violations of this chapter if such violations are deemed as criminal offenses in other statutes of North Dakota or of the United States.

All final decisions by the board shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 444, § 3; 1987, ch. 522, § 1; 1993, ch. 422, § 32.

43-15-42.2.
Impaired pharmacists program.

Any pharmaceutical peer review committee may report relevant facts to the board relating to the acts of any pharmacist in this state if it has knowledge relating to the pharmacist which, in the opinion of the peer review committee, might impair competency due to dependency on alcohol or drugs, abuse of alcohol or drugs, or due to physical or mental illness, or which might endanger the public health and safety or provide grounds for disciplinary action under chapter 43-15.

Any committee of a professional association comprised primarily of pharmacists, its staff, or any district or local intervenor participating in a program established to aid pharmacists impaired by substance abuse or mental or physical illness may report in writing to the board the name of the impaired pharmacist together with the pertinent information relating to the impairment. The board may report to any committee of such professional association, or the association’s designated staff, information which it may receive with regard to any pharmacist who may be impaired by substance abuse or mental or physical illness.

Upon a determination by the board that a report submitted by a peer review committee or professional association committee is without merit, the report must be expunged from the pharmacist’s individual record in the board’s office. A pharmacist or a pharmacist’s authorized representative may, on request, examine the pharmacist’s peer review or the pharmaceutical association’s committee report submitted to the board and place into the record a statement of reasonable length of the pharmacist’s view with respect to any information in the report.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 44-04-18, the records and proceedings of the board, compiled in conjunction with an impaired pharmacist peer review committee, are confidential and are not to be considered public records or open records unless the affected pharmacist so requests; provided, however, the board may disclose this confidential information only if any of the following apply:

In a disciplinary hearing before the board or in a subsequent trial or appeal of a board action or order.

To the pharmacist licensing or disciplinary authorities of other jurisdictions.

Under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

No employee or member of the board, peer review committee member, pharmaceutical association committee member, or pharmaceutical association district or local intervenor furnishing in good faith information, data, reports, or records for the purposes of aiding the impaired pharmacist may, by reason of furnishing the information, be liable for damages to any person.

No employee or member of the board or the committee, staff, or intervenor program is liable for damages to any person for any action taken or recommendations made in good faith by the board, committee, or staff.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 523, § 1.

43-15-42.3.
Reporting requirements — Penalty.

A pharmacist, pharmacy permitholder, pharmacy intern, pharmacy technician, health care institution in the state, state agency, or law enforcement agency in the state having actual knowledge that a pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy technician may have committed any of the grounds for disciplinary action provided by law or rules adopted by the board shall promptly report that information in writing to the state board of pharmacy. A pharmacist, pharmacy technician, or institution from which the pharmacist or pharmacy technician voluntarily resigns, or voluntarily limits that individual’s staff privileges, shall report the actions of the licensee or registrant to the state board of pharmacy if that action occurs while the licensee or registrant is under formal or informal investigation by the institution or a committee of the institution for any reason related to possible professional incompetence, unprofessional conduct, or mental or physical impairment. Upon receiving a report concerning a licensee or registrant, the board’s investigative committee may investigate any evidence that appears to show a licensee or registrant is committing, or may have committed, any of the grounds for disciplinary action provided by law or rules adopted by the board. A person required to report under this section who makes a report in good faith is not subject to criminal prosecution or civil liability for making the report. For purposes of any civil proceeding, the good faith of a person who makes the report under this section is presumed. A report to the impaired pharmacist program, the pharm-assist committee, of the North Dakota pharmacists association is considered reporting under this section. For purposes of this section, a person has actual knowledge if that person acquired the information by personal observation or under circumstances that cause that person to believe there exists a substantial likelihood that the information is correct. An agency or health care institution that violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. A pharmacist, pharmacy permitholder, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy technician who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor and is subject to administrative action by the state board of pharmacy as specified by law or by rule.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 363, § 6.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

43-15-42.4.
Limitations on disciplinary actions.

The board may not take disciplinary action against a pharmacist based solely on the pharmacist dispensing ivermectin for the off-label treatment or prevention of severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 identified as SARS-CoV-2, or any mutation or viral fragments of SARS-CoV-2.This section does not limit the board from taking a disciplinary action on another basis, such as unlicensed practice, inappropriate documentation, or substandard care, or any basis that would in the board’s determination harm the patient.

Source:

S.L. 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 559, § 2, effective November 15, 2021.

43-15-43.
Pharmacist negligently endangering life — Penalty.

Any pharmacist in this state, who in putting up any drug or medicine, willfully or negligently:

Omits to label the drug or medicine;

Puts an untrue label, stamp, or other designation of contents upon the box, bottle, or package containing the drug or medicine;

Substitutes a different article for an article prescribed or ordered;

Puts up a greater or less quantity of an article than that prescribed or ordered; or

Deviates from the terms of the prescription or order in any manner,

in consequence of which human life is endangered, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, § 446; R.C. 1895, § 7302; R.C. 1899, § 7302; R.C. 1905, § 9042; C.L. 1913, § 9758; R.C. 1943, § 43-1543; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 483; 1979, ch. 467, § 15.

43-15-44.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter for which another penalty is not specifically provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 31; C.L. 1913, § 505; S.L. 1927, ch. 211, § 9; R.C. 1943, § 43-1544; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 484.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses; penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Law Reviews.

Note: North Dakota’s Pharmacy Ownership Law: An Analysis of the Strictest Pharmacy Ownership Law in the United States, see 86 N.D. L. Rev. 355 (2010).

43-15-45.
Costs of prosecution — Disciplinary proceedings.

In any order or decision issued by the board in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding, the board may direct any certificate holder, permitholder, or licenseholder, or any pharmacy or pharmacist found not in compliance, guilty, or in violation of one or more of the grounds set forth in subsection 1 of section 43-15-10, to pay the board a sum not to exceed the reasonable and actual costs of the investigation and prosecution of the case, with the sanction that the certificate of registration, permit, or license may be suspended until the costs are paid to the board.

Source:

S.L. 1907, ch. 182, § 32, C.L. 1913, § 506; R.C. 1943, § 43-1545; S.L. 1987, ch. 524, § 1.